Vermont statutes. Title 11 Corporations, Partnerships, and Associations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 3401.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

A “certificate of limited partnership” means the certificate referred to in section 3411 of this title, and the certificate as amended or restated.

A “contribution” means any cash, property, services rendered, or a promissory note or other binding obligation to contribute cash or property or to perform services, which a partner contributes to a limited partnership in his or her capacity as a partner.

An “event of withdrawal of a general partner” means an event that causes a person to cease to be a general partner as provided in section 3432 of this title.

A “foreign limited partnership” means a partnership formed under laws other than the laws of this State and having as partners one or more general partners and one or more limited partners.

“General partner” means a person who has been admitted to a limited partnership as a general partner in accordance with the partnership agreement and named in the certificate of limited partnership as a general partner.

“Limited partner” means a person who has been admitted to a limited partnership as a limited partner in accordance with the partnership agreement.

“Limited partnership” and “domestic limited partnership” mean a partnership formed by two or more persons under the laws of this State and having one or more general partners and one or more limited partners.

“Partner” means a limited or general partner.

“Partnership agreement” means any valid agreement, written or oral, of the partners as to the affairs of a limited partnership and the conduct of its business.

“Partnership interest” means a partner’s share of the profits and losses of a limited partnership and the right to receive distributions of partnership assets.

“Person” means a natural person, partnership, limited partnership (domestic or foreign), trust, estate, association, corporation, or limited liability company.

“State” means a state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

§ 3402.
Name.

The name of each limited partnership as set forth in its certificate of limited partnership:

shall contain the words “Limited Partnership,” or the letters “L.P.”;

may not contain the name of a limited partner unless it is also the name of a general partner or the corporate name of a corporate general partner, or the business of the limited partnership had been carried on under that name before the admission of that limited partner;

shall be distinguishable in the records of the Secretary of State from the name of any corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or limited partnership organized under the laws of this State or licensed or registered as a foreign corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or limited partnership in this State; and

may not contain the following words: “corporation,” “incorporated,” “limited” by itself, “limited liability company,” “limited company,” or the abbreviations “corp.,” “Inc.,” or “Ltd.”

A person intending to operate a postsecondary school, as defined in

16 V.S.A. §§ 176

and 176a, shall apply for a certificate of approval from the State Board of Education prior to registering a name under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2003, No. 107

(Adj. Sess.), § 17;

2015, No. 17

, § 6.

§ 3403.
Reservation of name.

The exclusive right to the use of a name may be reserved by:

any person intending to organize a limited partnership under this chapter and to adopt that name;

any domestic limited partnership or any foreign limited partnership registered in this State which, in either case, intends to adopt that name;

any foreign limited partnership intending to register in this State and adopt that name; and

any person intending to organize a foreign limited partnership and intending to have it registered in this State and to adopt that name.

The reservation shall be made by filing with the Secretary of State an application, executed by the applicant, to reserve a specified name. If the Secretary of State finds that the name is available for use by a domestic or foreign limited partnership, he or she shall reserve the name for the exclusive use of the applicant for a period of 120 days. The owner of a name reserved under this section may renew the reservation for two successive periods of 120 days each. The right to the exclusive use of a reserved name may be transferred to any other person by filing in the Office of the Secretary of State a notice of the transfer, executed by the applicant for whom the name was reserved and specifying the name and address of the transferee.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

§ 3404.
Specified office and agent.

Each limited partnership shall continuously maintain in this State:

an office, which may but need not be a place of its business in this State, at which shall be kept the records required by section 3405 of this title to be maintained; and

an agent for service of process on the limited partnership, which agent must be an individual resident of this State, a domestic corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or a foreign corporation, partnership, or limited liability company authorized to do business in this State.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

§ 3405.
Records to be kept.

Each limited partnership shall keep at the office referred to in subdivision 3404(1) of this title the following:

a current list of the full name and last known business address of each partner, separately identifying the general partners (in alphabetical order) and the limited partners (in alphabetical order);

a copy of the certificate of limited partnership and all certificates of amendment thereto, together with executed copies of any powers of attorney pursuant to which any certificate has been executed;

copies of the limited partnership’s federal, state, and local income tax returns and reports, if any, for the three most recent years;

copies of any then effective written partnership agreements and of any financial statements of the limited partnership for the three most recent years; and

unless contained in a written partnership agreement, a writing setting out:

the amount of cash and a description and statement of the agreed value of the other property or services contributed by each partner and which each partner has agreed to contribute;

the times at which or events on the happening of which any additional contributions agreed to be made by each partner are to be made;

any right of a partner to receive, or of a general partner to make, distributions to a partner which include a return of all or any part of the partner’s contribution; and

any events upon the happening of which the limited partnership is to be dissolved and its affairs wound up.

Records kept under this section are subject to inspection and copying at the reasonable request and at the expense of any partner during ordinary business hours.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

§ 3406.
Nature of business.

A limited partnership may carry on any business that a partnership without limited partners may carry on except a business in which a corporation formed under the general corporation law may not engage.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.

§ 3407.
Business transactions of partner with partnership.

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partner may lend money to and transact other business with the limited partnership and, subject to other applicable law, has the same rights and obligations with respect thereto as a person who is not a partner.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 1999.